Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,139.01
Federal State Postsecondary Review Program; professional program, defined.

For purposes of the State Postsecondary Review Program, 20 U.S.C. 1099a, and all regulations and state review standards adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto, professional program shall have the same meaning as first professional degrees as such term is defined in section 85-937.

Laws 1995, LB 601, § 1.